Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-101
Military code; how cited.

Sections 55-101 to 55-181 shall be known and may be cited as the Military
Code.

Laws 1929, c. 189, § 1, p. 657;

C.S.1929, § 55-105;

R.S.1943, § 55-101;

Laws 1961, c. 272, § 1, p. 806;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 1, p. 1581;

Laws 1971, LB 19, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 313, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 69, § 2;

Laws 2010, LB550, § 1.